Tennessee, session 114, HB2521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-102-308(b)(2), is amended by
deleting "plus one (1) year" and substituting "plus two (2) years".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2521
011834
- 1 -